Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.16
Purchases by Nebraska State Fair Board; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases made by the Nebraska State Fair Board.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 43;

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 18.